public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dithionario_veneto-1.0.0-windows-xpi/dictionaries/vec.dic
inakuar/A
ralegrar/A
analiđar/A
apaltar/A
arkar/A
asar/A
inaŧidar/A
axevolar/A
bagaɉar/A
bakajar/A
inbalegar/A
balsamar/A
xbandir/A
xbaporar/A
inbarbotar/A
xbarufar/A
xbàter/A
inbaukar/A
baxnar/A
bekonar/A
bertonar/A
xbevaŧar/A
biaxemar/A
bindar/A
bisakar/A
xbixigolar/A
boɉir/A
xbokonar/A
inbonir/A
xbonsegar/A
borondolar/A
boteđar/A
dexboŧolar/A
bragetar/A
brandir/A
xbregar/A
xbrindolar/A
broɉar/A
bronbolar/A
brusketar/A
xbufar/A
inbutiliar/A
xbuxolar/A
scarir/A
celerar/A
soscèñer/A
tracéñer/A
cinconar/A
cucar/A
danar/A
dekiarar/A
deskalsar/A
prodigar/A
interdíxer/A
doler/A
domiŧiliar/A
dexdorar/A
xdotoređar/A
durar/A
đaltronar/A
đogolar/A
rinđovenar/A
rièser/A
riensir/A
adeskar/A
exeguir/A
dexasuefar/A
desfabregar/A
falir/A
desfamar/A
farfuñar/A
faŧar/A
edifegar/A
sakrifegar/A
fenir/A
deferir/A
konfermar/A
enfiar/A
sfiankonar/A
afidar/A
fikar/A
finar/A
fiondar/A
infisir/A
desfiubar/A
fogar/A
sfoɉar/A
infoñar/A
informar/A
desfornir/A
infóter/A
sfrantumar/A
infraskonar/A
perifraxar/A
rinfreskar/A
sfrixar/A
fruñolar/A
fulminar/A
infuriar/A
ingabanar/A
ingaletar/A
xganbetar/A
ingarbir/A
xgargatar/A
ingavar/A
ingloriar/A
paragonar/A
xgorgonar/A
xgrafiñar/A
grandenar/A
grapar/A
dexgravar/A
gremir/A
grilar/A
ingritolir/A
xgronŧolar/A
gruñir/A
gualivar/A
guernar/A
guxar/A
imaxinar/A
infilŧar/A
inpaxar/A
inritar/A
intrar/A
isar/A
justar/A
ɉelar/A
ɉostrar/A
ɉutar/A
inkaenar/A
inkalir/A
inkalkar/A
skaltrir/A
kamufar/A
skanelar/A
inkankarar/A
kantar/A
inkañir/A
deskapitar/A
karakolar/A
deskargar/A
karolar/A
skartabelar/A
skasir/A
katar/A
inkatiɉar/A
prokaŧar/A
kavalar/A
kaxamentar/A
koatar/A
kojonar/A
inkokonar/A
inkolorar/A
skomenŧar/A
komunegar/A
konfetar/A
koniugar/A
konotar/A
kontiđar/A
skonŧar/A
kórer/A
deskoraɉir/A
akòrđer/A
inkorniđar/A
kosar/A
koŧar/A
skovèrđer/A
inkrespar/A
skrikolar/A
krostar/A
krovar/A
skuadronar/A
kuentar/A
kufolar/A
deskular/A
rekuñar/A
inkurvar/A
kuxinar/A
languidir/A
lapiar/A
dexlatar/A
xlavrar/A
delegar/A
leskar/A
xlevar/A
skuilibrar/A
limar/A
xlisar/A
interlokuir/A
xlongar/A
xloxar/A
lungar/A
xlúxer/A
magonar/A
maliñar/A
demandar/A
mankar/A
mañar/A
marcar/A
marixar/A
marxinar/A
maskerar/A
xmatiđar/A
inmaxarar/A
frameđar/A
inmelar/A
menestrar/A
dexmerdar/A
méter/A
perméter/A
inmielar/A
deminuir/A
misturar/A
mokar/A
molestar/A
remondar/A
morir/A
morbinar/A
mormolar/A
dexmostrar/A
muar/A
mufir/A
murar/A
permutar/A
muxonar/A
renàser/A
nebiar/A
xnervar/A
niŧar/A
xnonbolar/A
anuir/A
xñaolar/A
oblegar/A
ofrir/A
òlder/A
ondeđar/A
opinar/A
dexordenar/A
inorpelar/A
osixenar/A
pacarar/A
padroniđar/A
inpaɉar/A
palernar/A
palpar/A
inpanar/A
spanpalar/A
parar/A
reparar/A
parlar/A
repartir/A
oltrepasar/A
despastar/A
patir/A
inpatriarkar/A
spavejar/A
peđorar/A
pelar/A
spelukar/A
depénder/A
inpenelar/A
inpensierir/A
pepolar/A
inperlar/A
peskar/A
despetar/A
despetorar/A
peŧolatar/A
piantar/A
piatolar/A
repiegar/A
spikolir/A
pionbar/A
inpirar/A
spisolar/A
piŧegar/A
aplaudir/A
polejar/A
inpoltronir/A
depóner/A
repóner/A
sponcar/A
sponteđar/A
spónxer/A
portar/A
desposesar/A
inpotacar/A
repovolar/A
intraprénder/A
spreŧar/A
dexinprimar/A
prontar/A
publegar/A
inpupar/A
putelar/A
inrabiar/A
dexraixar/A
ranpinar/A
ravanar/A
dexrenar/A
ridakiar/A
rodar/A
arolar/A
rosiđar/A
ruɉir/A
insabionar/A
salariar/A
insangonar/A
desavir/A
sedar/A
proseguir/A
konseɉar/A
konsentir/A
serkar/A
sfrisar/A
simolar/A
skakañar/A
skarpinar/A
skinkar/A
skravaŧar/A
soaŧar/A
solkar/A
asòrber/A
desparar/A
spergoŧar/A
spinar/A
respónder/A
restar/A
stanpar/A
steriliđar/A
sostituir/A
strakar/A
istrigar/A
strusiar/A
suàder/A
superar/A
tajar/A
takonar/A
taraŧar/A
tatarar/A
esténder/A
tenporeɉar/A
inkonteñir/A
atéñer/A
termenar/A
intimorir/A
retokar/A
tontonar/A
destortiɉar/A
protràer/A
trankuilar/A
destraviar/A
trexendar/A
tronbetar/A
desturbar/A
ŧavatar/A
inŧerar/A
ŧexelar/A
ŧiolar/A
ŧotiñar/A
ustegar/A
validar/A
varentar/A
xvegrar/A
vendemar/A
konveñir/A
skonvèñer/A
verniđar/A
envestir/A
invilir/A
dexviŧiar/A
invoɉar/A
revoltolar/A
xaolar/A
xbrisiar/A
xgañar/A
xmincar/A
